Tennessee, session 114, HB1936.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. On or before January 1, 2027, the department of health shall submit a
report on the feasibility and cost projections for creating and maintaining an implanted medical
device registry available to each healthcare facility in this state to the speaker of the senate and
the speaker of the house of representatives.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1936
011942
- 1 -